Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.350

Persons charged with enforcement barred from interest in pesticides, devices.

No person charged with the enforcement of any provision of this chapter shall be directly or indirectly interested in the sale, manufacture or distribution of any pesticide or device.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 35.]